Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Services and Care for Certain Children and Youth in Custody of or Under the Supervision of the Department of Human Services

§ 43-27-101.
Definitions applicable to Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103.

For purposes of Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Child or youth in the custody of the Department of Human Services” means an individual:

Who has not yet reached his eighteenth birthday;

Who has been legally placed in the custody of the Department of Human Services by the youth court and for whom custody with the Department of Human Services was not sought by the parents or legal custodians or guardians for the parents’ or legal custodians’ or guardians’ legal responsibilities to relieve themselves of the responsibility for paying for treatment for a child or youth; and

Who is unable to be maintained with the family or legal guardians or custodians due to his or her need for specialized care.

“Child or youth under the supervision of the Department of Human Services” means an individual:

Who has not yet reached his eighteenth birthday; and

Who has been referred for abuse or neglect and for whom a case has been opened and is active in the Division of Family and Children’s Services of the department.

“Plan of care” means a written plan of services needed to be provided for a child or youth and his or her family in order to provide the special care or services required.

“Special needs crisis” means conduct or behavioral problems of such a severe nature and level that family or parental violence, abuse, and/or neglect pose an imminent threat or are present.

“Specialized care” means:

“Self care,” which means the ability to provide, sustain and protect himself or herself at a level appropriate to his or her age;

“Interpersonal relationships,” which means the ability to build and maintain satisfactory relationships with peers and adults;

“Family life,” which means the capacity to live in a family or family-type environment;

“Self direction,” which means the child’s ability to control his or her behavior and to make decisions in a manner appropriate to his or her age;

“Education,” which means the ability to learn social and intellectual skill from teachers in an available educational setting.

“Special needs child” means a child with a variety of handicapping conditions or disabilities, including emotional or severely emotional disorders. These conditions or disabilities present the need for special medical attention, supervision and therapy on a very regimented basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-103.
Development of system of services for children in custody of or under supervision of Department of Human Services; services that may be provided.

Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103 shall enable the development by the Department of Human Services of a system of services for children or youth in the custody of or under the supervision of the Department of Human Services, if funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose. The system of services may consist of emergency response services, an early intervention and treatment unit, respite care, crisis nurseries, specialized outpatient or inpatient treatment services, special needs foster care, therapeutic foster care, emergency foster homes, and Medicaid targeted case management for abused and neglected children and youth as well as children adjudicated delinquent or in need of supervision. Any of these services that are provided shall be arranged by and coordinated through the Department of Human Services, and the department may contract with public or private agencies or entities to provide any of the services or may provide any of the services itself. All of the services shall be provided in facilities that meet the standards set by the Department of Human Services for the particular type of facility involved. None of the services provided shall duplicate existing services except where there is a documented need for expansion of the services.

A description of the services that may be provided under Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103 are as follows:

“Emergency response services” means services to respond to children or youth in severe crisis and include:

Emergency single point phone lines;

Crisis care coordinators staffing shifts that enable twenty-four-hour per day response as “front line” professionals when crisis calls are received, assist with decision-making, family support, initiate plan of action and remain “on call” for the first seventy-two (72) hours for other service professionals to get in place and insure development of a plan of care;

Acute care/emergency medical response through contracted services with up to five (5) regional hospitals providing emergency room services and hospitalization for up to seventy-two (72) hours with a maximum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per day;

Case managers;

Respite services; and

Assessment services contracted with social workers, psychologists, psychiatrists and other health professionals.

“Early intervention and treatment unit” means a unique, nonhospital crisis service in a residential context that is able to provide the level of support and intervention needed to resolve the crisis and as an alternative to hospitalization. This unit shall provide specialized assessment, including a variety of treatment options and services to best intervene in a child or youth’s crisis, and provide an appropriate plan for further services upon returning to the home and community. Staff-to-child or youth ratio shall be high, with multidisciplinary, specialized services for up to six (6) children or youths at one (1) time, and with the maximum assessment and treatment planning and services being ninety (90) days for most children or youths.

“Respite care” means planned temporary care for a period of time ranging from a few hours within a twenty-four-hour period to an overnight or weekend stay to a maximum of ten (10) days. Care may be provided in-home or out-of-home with trained respite parents or counselors and is designed to provide a planned break for the parents from the caretaking role with the child.

“Crisis nurseries” means a program providing therapeutic nursery treatment services to preschool aged children who as preschoolers demonstrate significant behavioral or emotional disorders. These services shall be to therapeutically address developmental and emotional behavioral difficulties through direct intervention with the child in a nursery school environment and to intervene with parents to provide education, support and therapeutic services.

“Specialized outpatient or inpatient treatment services,” such as sex offender treatment, means specialized treatment for perpetrators of sexual offenses with children.

“Special needs foster care” means foster care for those children with a variety of handicapping conditions or disabilities, including serious emotional disturbance.

“Therapeutic foster care” means residential mental health services provided to children and adolescents in a family setting, utilizing specially trained foster parents. Therapeutic foster care essentially involves the following features:

Placement with foster parents who have been carefully selected by knowledgeable, well-trained mental health and social service professionals to work with children with an emotional disturbance;

Provision of special training to the foster parents to assist them in working with children with an emotional disturbance;

Low staff-to-child ratio, allowing the therapeutic staff to work very closely with each child, the foster parents and the biological parents, if available;

Creation of a support system among these specially trained foster parents; and

Payment of a special foster care payment to the foster parents.

“Emergency foster homes” means those homes used on a short-term basis for (i) children who are temporarily removed from the home in response to a crisis situation, or (ii) youth who exhibit special behavioral or emotional problems for whom removal from the existing home situation is necessary. In some cases they may provide an emergency placement for infants and toddlers for whom no regular foster home is available, rather than placement into an emergency shelter where older and larger groups of children are placed. Foster parents are trained to deal with the special needs of children placed in these emergency homes.

“Medicaid targeted case management” means activities that are related to assuring the completion of proper client evaluations; arranging and supporting treatment plans, monitoring services, coordinating service delivery and other related actions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-105.
Funding for placement resources.

Funding for the placement resources authorized in Sections 43-27-101 and 43-27-103 shall be used to match appropriate federal funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-107.
Qualifications of family protection specialists; status as state service employees; time-limited employee positions [Repealed effective July 1, 2019].

The Department of Human Services is authorized to set the qualifications necessary for all family protection specialists employed by the department, which shall at a minimum require that the applicant possess a baccalaureate degree in social work from a college or university accredited by the Council on Social Work Education or Southern Association of Colleges and Schools, unless the person was licensed as a social worker before September 1, 1994, pursuant to Section 73-53-7, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The qualifications for employment of a family protection specialist at the senior, advanced and supervisory grades shall require, in addition to those required of a family protection specialist, state licensure as a social worker.

The department shall not be required to go through the State Personnel Board or use the qualifications set by the Personnel Board in employing any family protection specialists for the department. All family protection specialists employed by the department shall be state service employees from the date of their employment with the department; however, to carry out its responsibilities, the department may use any available federal funds to employ such additional family protection specialists as it can employ in time-limited positions. All social worker positions existing before July 1, 1998, will remain state service.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2019.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 20; Laws, 1998, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 14; Laws, 2000, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 7; Laws, 2009, ch. 364, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 461, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 470, § 7; Laws, 2015, ch. 403, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-27-109.
Employment of additional family protection specialists, youth counselors and clerical staff.

The Department of Human Services may employ a sufficient number of new family protection specialists, youth counselors and clerical staff to reduce the caseload sizes for social workers and youth counselors of the department and to reduce the workload on clerical staff, if funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 21; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 6; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 43-27-111.
Supervision of county youth services workers by department; coordination with state workers.

The Department of Human Services shall exercise jurisdiction and supervision over youth services workers employed by the counties, if funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose, and the duties of those workers shall be coordinated with the duties of youth services workers employed by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-113.
Law enforcement assistance in department investigations of child abuse or neglect.

In any investigation by the Department of Human Services of a report made under Section 43-21-101 et seq. of the abuse or neglect of a child as defined in Section 43-21-105, the department may request the appropriate law enforcement officer with jurisdiction to accompany the department in its investigation, and in such cases the law enforcement officer shall comply with such request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-115.
Program managers for department regions; duties; department to develop agreements with other service entities.

The Department of Human Services is authorized to employ one (1) program manager for each department region, if funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose, whose duties shall be to develop an ongoing public education program to inform Mississippi citizens about the needs of the state’s children, youth and families, the work of the department in addressing these needs and how citizens might become involved. The Department of Human Services shall develop formal agreements of cooperation and protocol between the department and other providers of services to children and families including school districts, hospitals, law enforcement agencies, mental health centers and others.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-117.
Online automated child welfare information system.

The Department of Human Services is authorized to establish an online automated child welfare information system, if funds are appropriated to the department for that purpose, to give the department the capability to supply foster care, adoption and child abuse and neglect data to the federal Department of Health and Human Services in a specified format as required, and to help the department in tracking child abuse and neglect referrals and the number of children affected in those referrals.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-119.
Joint task force to research when court decisions should be appealed; protocol.

There is created a joint task force of the Department of Human Services and the Attorney General’s Office consisting of the executive director of the department, the Attorney General, any staff persons designated by the executive director and the Attorney General, and any other persons designated by the executive director and the Attorney General. The joint task force shall research the issue of when the department should consider appealing court decisions that are contrary to the department’s recommendations in child welfare and juvenile offender cases, and shall issue a protocol for determining the type of cases that should be appealed. The protocol shall establish the following:

General guidelines to be considered for appealing a case;

The type of information from case records and court records that should be entered into the appeal file; and

The individuals who have authority to set the appeals process in motion and who can make final decisions about whether an appeal should be filed or not.

Not later than November 30, 1994, the joint task force shall complete its research, issue the protocol, and make recommendations to the Legislature for any administrative and legislative action necessary to properly and sufficiently address this issue.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-27-121.
Child Welfare Enhancement Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Child Welfare Enhancement Fund,” which shall consist of such monies as provided by law to be deposited in the fund. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Human Services upon appropriations of the monies in the fund by the Legislature. The monies in the fund shall be expended to enhance the state’s services for children and youth, including, but not limited to, implementation of the recommendations in the November 1, 1992, report by the Child Welfare League of America.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1994.